Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.010

Corporate powers.

The several counties in this state shall have capacity as bodies corporate, to sue and be sued in the manner prescribed by law; to purchase and hold lands; to make such contracts, and to purchase and hold such personal property, as may be necessary to their corporate or administrative powers, and to do all other necessary acts in relation to all the property of the county.

[ 1986 c 278 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.01.010. Prior: Code 1881 s 2653; 1863 p 538 s 1; 1854 p 329 s 1; RRS s 3982.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 278: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1986 c 278 s 65.]